Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1054
Service surcharge, defined.

Service surcharge means a charge set by a local governing body and assessed on each telephone number or functional equivalent of service users whose primary place of use is within the local governing body's designated 911 service area, with the exception of those service users served by wireless carriers.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 234;

Laws 2007, LB661, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-433;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 36.